Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-248
Right-of-way for irrigation laterals; condemnation; procedure.

Whenever any person has acquired any rights to water for any lands owned by him, where, prior to the building of the laterals and the application of the water, any intervening canal, ditch, or lateral has been constructed, he shall have the right to construct laterals from such irrigation canal to the lands owned by him and to have such irrigation laterals across the lands and intervening canals to the land owned by him. If such intervening owner shall refuse to sell the right-of-way for such irrigation lateral, the owner shall have the right of eminent domain to condemn such right-of-way. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 4, p. 847;

C.S.1922, § 8454;

C.S.1929, § 46-604;

R.S.1943, § 46-248;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 93, p. 488.